Maryland, session 2025, SB0711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1011.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE
RECREATION OVERSIGHT BOARD.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0711*

SENATE BILL 711
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE
TRAIL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1011 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THERE IS AN OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE RECREATION
OVERSIGHT BOARD.
(C) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND OFF–HIGHWAY
VEHICLE ALLIANCE;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MOTORCYCLE
DEALERS ASSOCIATION;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE AMERICAN MOTORCYCLIST
ASSOCIATION DISTRICT 7;
(IV) ONE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING ALL–TERRAIN VEHICLE,
UTILITY TERRAIN VEHICLE, OR SIDE–BY–SIDE VEHICLE DRIVERS; AND
(V) ONE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING ON– AND OFF–ROAD
MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVERS.
(2) EACH MEMBER SHALL BE A RESIDENT OF THE STATE.
(D) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR EACH
YEAR.
(E) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.

SENATE BILL 711 3
(5) IF A VACANCY OCCURS AMONG THE MEMBERS, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL PROMPTLY APPOINT A SUCCESSOR WHO SHALL SERVE UNTIL THE TERM
EXPIRES.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE BOARD.
(2) ADDITIONAL SUPPORT FOR THE BOARD SHALL BE PROVIDED BY:
(I) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(II) THE MARYLAND PARK SERVICE;
(III) THE FOREST SERVICE;
(IV) THE WILDLIFE AND HERITAGE SERVICE; AND
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF EACH COUNTY IN WHICH AN
OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TRAIL MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IS LOCATED, DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY.
(H) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) ADVISE ADVISE THE SECRETARY ON THE OPERATION,
ACQUISITION, REGULATION, AND GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF OFF–HIGHWAY
RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TRAILS AND RECREATION IN THE STATE; AND
(2) REVIEW EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION.
(I) AN EXPENDITURE FROM THE FUND SHALL BE REVIEWED BY THE BOARD
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING RECOMMENDATIONS:
(1) AT LEAST 25% OF THE ANNUAL FUND BALANCE SHALL BE USED
FOR TRAIL DEVELOPMENT;
(2) AT LEAST 10% OF THE ANNUAL FUND BALANCE SHALL BE USED
FOR OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE TRAIL MAINTENANCE;
(3) AT LEAST 10% OF THE ANNUAL FUND BALANCE SHALL BE USED
FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OR MAINTENANCE OF CAMPING SITES, PARKING, OR OTHER
INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO SUPPORT OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL

SENATE BILL 711
VEHICLE RIDERS AND RECREATIONAL ACTIVITIES ON LANDS MANAGED PRIMARILY
FOR OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE USE;
(4) AT LEAST 5% OF THE ANNUAL FUND BALANCE SHALL BE USED TO
LEASE LANDS FOR PUBLIC OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLE USE;
(5) AT LEAST 10% OF THE ANNUAL FUND BALANCE SHALL BE
AUTHORIZED TO ADVERTISE, PROMOTE, AND MARKET OFF–HIGHWAY
RECREATIONAL VEHICLE USE AND EDUCATION IN THE STATE; AND
(6) FUNDS FROM THE FUND SHALL BE USED TO COVER THE
ADMINISTRATIVE AND OPERATING COSTS OF THE BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
appointed members of the Off–Highway Recreational Vehicle Recreation Oversight Board
established under Section 1 of this Act shall expire as follows:
(1) one member in 2026;
(2) two members in 2027; and
(3) two members in 2028.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.